Massachusetts, session 194th, H2264.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The second paragraph of section 22 of chapter 40 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following sentence:- No
penalty shall be imposed upon any veteran whose vehicle bears the distinctive number plates
authorized by said section 2 of said chapter 90 for parking such vehicle on any way for a longer
period of time than permitted by said ordinances, by-laws, rules or orders.
SECTION 2. The second paragraph of section 22A of said chapter 40, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by adding the following sentence:- No fee shall be exacted and no penalty shall
be imposed by any city or town for the parking of any vehicle owned and driven by a veteran
bearing the distinctive number plates authorized by said section 2 of said chapter 90.
SECTION 3. Section 20A of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:-
of 2

No fine or violation for parking shall be imposed upon any veteran whose vehicle bears
the distinctive number plates or displays the special parking identification plate authorized by
section 2 of chapter 90.
SECTION 4. Section 20A½ of said chapter 90, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
adding the following paragraph:-
In the cities of Boston and Cambridge and in any city or town which accepts the
provisions of this section, no fine or violation for parking shall be imposed upon any veteran
whose vehicle bears the distinctive number plates or displays the special parking identification
plate authorized by section 2 of chapter 90.
of 2